Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1501
Sheltered workshop, defined.

As used in sections 48-1501 to 48-1506, unless the context otherwise requires, sheltered workshop shall mean a facility in Nebraska operated by a public agency or a private nonprofit corporation organized for the primary purpose of employment of and service to physically or mentally disabled clients in a program of rehabilitation. Such facility shall be certified as a sheltered workshop, a work activity center, or an equivalent by an independent accrediting agency and comply with the Fair Labor Standards Amendments of 1966, Public Law No. 89-601, 80 Stat. 830, as a sheltered workshop or a work activity center.

Laws 1984, LB 540, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 238, § 5.